src/fst/morphology/incoming/Blackfoot_full.lexc
LEXICON PN_COUNTER1
@D.pvcountf@@R.count1.N@@P.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.N@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.A@@P.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.A@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.T@@P.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.T@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.P@@P.pvcountf.4@@R.count1.P@ PREFIXES2 ;
0 PRENOUNS ;

LEXICON BOUND3
0:%< PN_COUNTER ;

LEXICON PN_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PRENOUNS ;
! @R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PRENOUNS ;


LEXICON PREFIXES
@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@0 PV_COUNTER1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2máát BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2miin BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2piin BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@PV/máátaommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPmáátaommita'p BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.P@PV/ikátá'+:@P.count1.P@i2kátá' BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Imm+:@P.count1.T@ayáak BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Dur+:@P.count1.T@á BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Fut+:@P.count1.T@yáak BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Past+:@P.count1.T@ii BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@akáa BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ikáa BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@okáa BOUND1 ; ! enumerating this one because it appears in these three forms

LEXICON BOUND1
0:%< PV_COUNTER1 ;

!! This counter ensures that each type of prenoun can only appear once in the following order: Negation | 0, Tense | 0, Aspect | 0, then ikata' | 0.

LEXICON PV_COUNTER1
@D.pvcountf@@R.count1.N@@P.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.N@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.A@@P.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.A@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.T@@P.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.T@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.P@@P.pvcountf.4@@R.count1.P@ PREFIXES ;
0 PREVERBS ;

LEXICON BOUND
0:%< PV_COUNTER ;

LEXICON PV_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PREVERBS ;
!@R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PREVERBS ;

LEXICON VERB_STEMS
@R.class.VAI@@R.pos.VERB@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@@R.pos.VERB@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTI@@R.pos.VERB@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTA@@R.pos.VERB@	VTA_STEMS ;
@P.class.VAI@@R.pos.VERBALIZE@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.class.VII@@R.pos.VERBALIZE@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;

!!! Now we collect the verb and noun stems !!!

! I am going to include the concrete verb finals (see Frantz 2017 chapter 18.)
! The reason being that this is the best place to control them considering the four verb classes
! The relfexive changes VTA verbs into VAI verbs and takes VAI suffixes. The same is true of the reciprocal. 
! The benfactive changes Intransitive to Transitive verbs.

!!!!! After this, we collect the stems !!!!!

! Blackfoot Regular Noun Stems

! Below are the INDEPENDENT noun stems and their allomorphic forms (only if the allomorph is irregular). 

LEXICON NOUN_STEMS
!@P.class.NA@0 
INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
!@P.class.NI@0 
INDEP_NI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VAI@0	
VAI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VII@0	
VII_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VTI@0	
VTI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VTA@0	
VTA_STEMS ;

! Blackfoot Regular Noun Stems

! Below are the INDEPENDENT noun stems and their allomorphic forms (only if the allomorph is irregular). 

! When working with the lexicon, be sure to know the following lexical information:
! 1. Does it ALWAYS take the /-im/ suffix when possessed? If so, use NA_IM or NI_IM
! 2. Does the word take a short person prefix? If so, put %^SP at the beginning of the stem
! 3. What allomorphy does the stem undergo? If it takes oh-, put h at the beginning of the stem. If i -> o, use i3. If a -> i2, use a4. 
! If a -> o, use a3. 
! 4. Everything else should be accounted for in the phonology

LEXICON DEP_STEMS
@P.pos.NA@ DEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.pos.NI@ DEP_NI_STEMS ;

LEXICON DEP_NA_STEMS
! Test Stems
! nohkówa:ohkó                NAD ;
! naaáhsa:maaáhs              NAD ;
! nitána:itán                 NAD ;
! niksíssta:iksísst           NAD ;
! Full list
naaáhsa:maaáhs	NAD ;
naakiaaahsa:aakiaaahs	NAD ;
náákiima:áákiim	NAD ;
náwahkahtaana:áwahkahtaan	NAD ;
ni'sa:i's	NAD ;
ni'sohkiimaana:i'sohkiimaan	NAD ;
niihkawawa:iihkawa	NAD ;
niihsissa:iihsiss	NAD ;
nikííhtsimaana:ikííhtsimaan	NAD ;
niksimmotsiima:iksimmotsiim	NAD ;
niksíssta:iksísst	NAD ;
nikso'kowa:ikso'kowa	NAD ;
nimssa:imss	NAD ;
ninaaáhsa:inaaáhs	NAD ;
ninaapiima:inaapiim	NAD ;
ninna:inn	NAD ;
nínssta:ínsst	NAD ;
nippitaama:ippitaam	NAD ;
nisahkínaima:isahkínaim	NAD ;
nisahkómaapiima:isahkómaapiim	NAD ;
nissa:iss	NAD ;
nisskána:isskán	NAD ;
nissohkiimaana:issohkiimaan	NAD ;
nissohkowa:issohko	NAD ;
níssoko'sa:íssoko's	NAD ;
nissotana:issotan	NAD ;
nisstamowa:isstamo	NAD ;
nisstamoohkowa:isstamoohko	NAD ;
nitana:itan	NAD ;
niitsistowahsina:niitsistowahsin	NAD ;
nohkówa:ohkó	NAD ;
nohpapiiyihpa:ohpapiiyihp	NAD ;
nohpatooma:ohpatoom	NAD ;
noko'sa:oko's	NAD ;
nokoksissta:okoksisst	NAD ;
nokonna:okonn	NAD ;
nomahkinaima:omahkinaim	NAD ;
nooma:oom	NAD ;
nootoohkiimaana:ootoohkiimaan	NAD ;
nootoyooma:ootoyoom	NAD ;
noppitaama:oppitaam	NAD ;
nóta'sa:óta's	NAD ;
noyínnaawa:oyínnaa	NAD ;
nisskáni'taama:sskáni'taam	NAD ;
niyiihkowa:yiihkowa	NAD ;

LEXICON DEP_NI_STEMS
nookóówayi:ookóówan     NID ;
nookóówayi:ookóówa     NID ;

! These are the Blackfoot verb stems.
! They are organized by their inflectional classes.
! All allomorphic triggers have been added

LEXICON NA
@R.pos.NOUN@+NA:@R.pos.NOUN@0  NA_0_IM ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+NA+Der/Verb+VAI:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NA:@P.number.SG@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI@R.class.VERB@:0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NA:@P.number.PL@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI@R.class.VERB@:0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_IM
@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@+NA:@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@  NA_0_IM ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+NA+Der/Verb+VAI:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NA:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI:@R.class.VERB@0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NA:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI:@R.class.VERB@0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI
@R.pos.NOUN@+NI:@R.pos.NOUN@0  NI_0_IM ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+NI+Der/Verb+VII:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NI:@P.number.SG@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+NI@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NI:@P.number.PL@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_IM
@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@+NI:@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@0  NI_0_IM ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+NI+Der/Verb+VII:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NI:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NI:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NAD
+NAD:0  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NAD:@P.number.SG@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NAD:@P.number.PL@  NA_0_IM ;

!LEXICON NAD_IM
!@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

LEXICON NID
+NID:0  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NID:@P.number.SG@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NID:@P.number.PL@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

!LEXICON NID_IM
!@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! Below is the combinatorial PARADIGM for the possessive circumfixes

! POSS+stem+POSS+NUM
! POSS+stem+POSS+OBV
! stem+NUM
! stem+OBV

LEXICON PRENOUNS
0 NOUN_STEMS ;
PV/anaw+:anaw BOUND3 ;
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND3 ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist BOUND3 ;
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND3 ;
PV/inai't+:inai't BOUND3 ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa BOUND3 ;
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND3 ;
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND3 ;
PV/mato+:mato BOUND3 ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi BOUND3 ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND3 ;
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap BOUND3 ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk BOUND3 ;
PV/sootam+:i2sootam BOUND3 ;
PV/waahki+:waahki BOUND3 ;
PV/yook+:yook BOUND3 ;
PN/aaká+:aaká	BOUND3 ;
PN/ayaam+:ayaam	BOUND3 ;
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta	BOUND3 ;
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto	BOUND3 ;
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi	BOUND3 ;
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND3 ;
PN/itsin+:itsin	BOUND3 ;
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND3 ;
PN/nimm+:nimm	BOUND3 ;
PN/ohpo+:ohpo	BOUND3 ;
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND3 ;
PN/paahksíst+:paahksíst	BOUND3 ;
PN/sainnis+:sainnis	BOUND3 ;
PN/sikim+:i2sikim	BOUND3 ;
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND3 ;
LEXICON PREVERBS
0 VERB_STEMS ;
PV/anaw+:anaw BOUND ;
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist BOUND ;
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND ;
PV/inai't+:inai't BOUND ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa BOUND ;
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND ;
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND ;
PV/mato+:mato BOUND ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi BOUND ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND ;
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap BOUND ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk BOUND ;
PV/sootam+:i2sootam BOUND ;
PV/waahki+:waahki BOUND ;
PV/yook+:yook BOUND ;
PN/aaká+:aaká	BOUND ;
PN/ayaam+:ayaam	BOUND ;
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta	BOUND ;
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto	BOUND ;
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi	BOUND ;
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND ;
PN/itsin+:itsin	BOUND ;
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND ;
PN/nimm+:nimm	BOUND ;
PN/ohpo+:ohpo	BOUND ;
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND ;
PN/paahksíst+:paahksíst	BOUND ;
PN/sikim+:i2sikim	BOUND ;
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND ;
LEXICON INDEP_NA_STEMS
stamika:%^SPstamik	NA_IM ;
sta'koomiiwa:%^SPsta'koomii	NA ;
soohksiisiimsstaana:%^SPsoohksiisiimsstaan	NA ;
sisttsíwa:sisttsí	NA ;
sikohkiaayowa:%^SPsikohkiaayo	NA ;
sa'áíwa:%^SPsa'áí	NA ;
poosa:hpoos	NA_IM ;
ponokáwa:innoka NA_IM ;
ponokáómitaawa:innokáómitaa NA_IM ;
pí'kihtaana:pí'kihtaan	NA ;
omahkátoyiiki'somiaato'sa:omahkátoyiiki'sommiaato's	NA ;
óóhkotoka:óóhkotok	NA_IM ;
otahkoiimiwa:otahkoiimi	NA ;
omahksikaapiikoana:omahksikaapiikoan	NA ;
ohkiimaana:ohkiimaan	NA ;
náísttooyiiksikkssooa'tsisa:náísttooyiiksikkssooa'tsis	NA ;
miaawaahpitsiiwa:miaawaahpitsii	NA ;
mí'ksskimiksísoyiwa:mí'ksskimmiksísoyi	NA ;
máakááhkima'tsisa:máakááhkima'tsis	NA ;
kottonaa'wa:kottonaa'	NA ;
ksaahkoma:ksaahkomm	NA ;
kiááyowa:hkiááyo	NA_IM ;
katsiiksiwa:katsiiksi	NA ;
iihtsipáítapiiyo'pa:iihtsipáítapiiyo'p	NA ;
isska:issk	NA ;
imitááwa:i3mitáá	NA_IM ;
imitaikoana:i3mitaikoan	NA_IM ;
ikohkiaapittaa'tsisa:ikohkiaapittaa'tsis	NA ;
iitawáakohsimao'pa:iitawáakohsimao'p	NA ;
iiníwa:iiníí	NA_IM ;
iihtáíssáakio'pa:i3htáíssáakio'p	NA ;
i'ksisakoma:i'ksisakomm	NA ;
áókakihtsimaawa:áókakihtsimaa	NA ;
áípakkohtama:áípakkohtamm	NA ;
áwatoyiwa:áwatoyi	NA ;
apaksskióómiiwa:apaksskióómii	NA ;
áótahkááokayisa:áótahkááokayis NA_IM ;
aiksisstoomatapisttsipatakkayayiwa:aiksisstoomatapisttsipatakkayayi	NA ;
aiksiniwa:aiksini NA_IM ;
a'síítsiksima:a'síítsiksimm	NA ;
LEXICON INDEP_NI_STEMS
soyíísiitsiksskoyi:soyíísiitsikssko	NI ;
sáíkimao'tonipsstaani:sáíkimao'tonipsstaan	NI ;
sipisttoipasskaani:sipisttoipasskaan	NI ;
pitsííksiináóowahsini:pitsííksiináóowahsin	NI ;
páyooyi:hpáyoo	NI_IM ;
panáaikssta'tsisi:panáaikssta'tsis	NI ;
ó'kapayini:ó'kapayin	NI ;
oohkinaakini:oohkinaakin	NI ;
owahsini:owahsin	NI ;
oyííyisi:oyííyis	NI ;
ni'tsikópottoyi:ni'tsikópotto	NI ;
mamiiksistsikoyi:mamiiksistsiko	NI ;
mo'tsísi:%^SPmo'tsís	NI ;
misisayi:misisa	NI ;
máakohkima'tsisi:máakohkimma'tsis	NI ;
ksowahsini:ksowahsin	NI ;
kominokoyi:hkominoko	NI ; ! 
kaapoksiinimaani:i2kaapoksiinimaan	NI ;
itsikini:itsikin	NI ;
isstsímotsiiy'ssiniyi:i2sstsímotsiiy'ssini	NI ;
issáana'kima'tsisi:i2ssáana'kima'tsis	NI ;
ikkstóttsisi:ikkstóttsis	NI ;
iitáísátsaakio'pi:iitáísátsaakio'p	NI ;
iihtáísttsikááhkimao'pi:ii3htáísttsikááhkimao'p	NI ;
i'ksisáka'piyi:i3'ksisáka'pi	NI ;
áísaipihkáísttsomo'kaani:áísaipihkáísttsomo'kaan	NI ;
astotoohsini:astotoohsin	NI ;
anootapisttsomo'kaani:anootapisttsomo'kaan	NI ;
aapíínima'tsisi:%^SPa3píínima'tsis	NI ;
awáksipistaani:awáksipistaan	NI ;
